Utah statutes.
50-2-3.   Combinations to control news unlawful.

Any combination having for its object or effect the controlling of information or news gathered or accumulated for distribution and publication shall be deemed a trust, and hostile to the public welfare, and is prohibited and declared unlawful.



No Change Since 1953

